Missouri, session 2026, SB1011.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 1.037 and 1.202, to
read as follows:
1.037. The World Health Organization, the United
Nations, the World Economic Forum, and any other
international organization or body shall have no
jurisdiction or power within the state of Missouri. No
rule, regulation, fee, tax, policy, or mandate of any kind
of the World Health Organization, the United Nations, the
World Economic Forum, or any other international
organization or body shall be enforced or implemented by the
state of Missouri or any agency, department, board, or
commission of the state or any municipality or other
political subdivision of the state.
1.202. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "No Shari'a Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms shall
mean:
(1) "Foreign law", any law, legal code, or system
derived from a jurisdiction outside the United States or its

SB 1011 2
territories, including religious law when invoked as a
substitute for a state or federal law;
(2) "Fundamental rights", rights guaranteed by the
constitution of the state of Missouri and the Constitution
of the United States, including, but not limited to, due
process, equal protection, freedom of religion, freedom of
speech, and rights related to marriage, child custody, and
property.
3. (1) No court shall enforce a judgment, decree, or
arbitration decision if it relies, in whole or in part, on
Shari'a or any foreign law that violates the constitutional
rights of any party.
(2) A contract provision choosing foreign law shall be
valid unless enforcement would result in a violation of
constitutional rights.
(3) In matters involving marriage, divorce, child
custody, adoption, or inheritance, no court shall apply or
enforce foreign law if inconsistent with fundamental rights
or public policy.
✓